Hawaii statutes.
§92-3.1 Limited meetings. (a) If a
board determines that it is necessary to meet at a location that is dangerous
to health or safety, or if a board determines that it is necessary to conduct
an on-site inspection of a location that is related to the board's business at
which public attendance is not practicable, and the director of the office of
information practices concurs, the board may hold a limited meeting at that
location that shall not be open to the public; provided that at a regular
meeting of the board prior to the limited meeting:

(1) The board determines, after sufficient public
deliberation, that it is necessary to hold the limited meeting and specifies
that the location is dangerous to health or safety or that the on-site
inspection is necessary and public attendance is impracticable;

(2) Two-thirds of all members to which the board is
entitled vote to adopt the determinations required by paragraph (1); and

(3) Notice of the limited meeting is provided in
accordance with section 92-7.

(b) A county council may hold a limited
meeting that is open to the public, as the guest of a board or community group
holding its own meeting, and the council shall not be required to have a quorum
of members in attendance or accept oral testimony; provided that:

(1) Notice of the limited meeting shall be provided
in accordance with section 92-7, shall indicate the board or community group
whose meeting the council is attending, and shall not be required to include an
agenda;

(2) If the board or community group whose meeting the
council is attending is subject to part I, chapter 92, then that board or
community group shall comply with the notice, agenda, testimony, minutes, and
other requirements of part I, chapter 92;

(3) No more than one limited meeting per month shall
be held by a county council for any one board or community group;

(4) No limited meetings shall be held outside the
State; and

(5) Limited meetings shall not be used to circumvent
the purpose of part I, chapter 92.

(c) At all limited meetings, the board shall:

(1) Videotape the meeting, unless the requirement is
waived by the director of the office of information practices, and comply with
all requirements of section 92-9;

(2) Make the videotape available at the next regular
meeting; and

(3) Make no decisions at the meeting.

(d) Each county council shall submit an annual
report to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session on the effectiveness and application of limited meeting
procedures provided in subsection (b), including any recommendations or
proposed legislation. [L 1995, c 212, §1; am L 2008, c 20, §1; am L 2014, c
221, §§2, 4; am L 2016, c 56, §§1, 2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next